Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1161.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Department of public safety; Yuma county family advocacy center; exemption The $750,000 appropriated to the department of public safety for the Yuma county family advocacy center distribution in fiscal year 2025-2026 pursuant to Laws 2025, chapter 233, section 77 is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to the lapsing of appropriations.